en: vitamins, vitamin, vit.
af: vitamien, vit.
ar: فيتامين
as: ভিটামিন
az: vitaminlər, vit.
ba: витаминдар
be: вітаміны, вітамін
bg: витамини, витамин, vitamins, vit.
bn: ভিটামিন
bs: vitamini, vitamin, vit.
ca: vitamina, vitamines, vit.
cs: vitaminy, vitamín, vit.
cv: витамин
cy: fitaminau, fitamin
da: vitaminer, vitamin, vit.
de: Vitamine, Vitamin, Vitaminmischung, Vit.
dv: ވިޓަމިން
el: βιταμίνες, βιταμίνη
eo: vitamino
es: vitaminas, vitamina, vit.
et: vitamiin, vitamiinid, vit.
eu: bitamina
fa: ویتامین
fi: vitamiinit, vitamiini, vit.
fo: vitamin
fr: vitamines, vitamine, mélange de vitamines, vit.
ga: vitimín, vit.
gl: vitamina, vit.
he: ויטמין
hi: विटामिन
hr: vitamin, vitamini, vitaminska mješavina, vit.
ht: vitamin, vit.
hu: vitaminok, vitamin, vit.
hy: վիտամին
ia: vitamina, vit.
id: vitamin, vit.
is: vítamín, vit.
it: vitamine, vit.
ja: ビタミン
jv: vitamin, vit.
ka: ვიტამინი
kk: дәрумен
km: វីតាមីន
kn: ಜೀವಸತ್ವಗಳು
ko: 비타민
ky: витаминдер
la: vitaminum, vit.
lb: vitamin, vit.
lg: vitamin, vit.
lo: ວິຕາມິນ
lt: vitaminai, vitaminas, vit.
lv: vitamīni, vit.
mk: витамин
ml: ജീവകം
mr: जीवनसत्त्व
ms: vitamin, vit.
mt: vitamini, vit.
my: ဗီတာမင်
nb: vitaminer, vitamin, vit.
ne: भिटामिन
nl: vitamines, vitaminen, vitamine, vit.
nn: vitaminer, vitamin, vit.
no: vitaminer, vitamin, vit.
nv: vitamine, vit.
oc: vitamina, vit.
or: ଜୀବସାର
pa: ਵਿਟਾਮਿਨ
pl: witamina, witaminy
ps: ويټامين
pt: vitaminas, vitamina, premezcla de vitaminas, vit.
ro: vitamine, vitamină, vit.
ru: витамин
sh: vitamini, vitamin, vit.
si: විටමින්
sk: vitamíny, vitamín, vit.
sl: vitamini, vitamin, vit.
so: fiitamiin
sq: vitamina, vitaminat, vit.
sr: витамини, витамин
su: vitamin, vit.
sv: vitaminer, vitamin, vit., vitaminmix
sw: vitamini, vit.
ta: உயிர்ச்சத்து
te: విటమిన్
tg: витамин
th: วิตามิน
tk: witamin
tl: bitamina
tr: vitamin, vit.
tt: витамин
uk: вітаміни
ur: حیاتین
uz: vitaminlar, vit.
vi: vitamin, vit.
wa: vitamene, vit.
yi: וויטאמין
yo: àmínìamáralókun
zh: 维生素

en: vitamin A
xx: vitamin A, A vitamin
af: vitamien A
ar: ﻒﻴﺗﺎﻤﻴﻧ ﺄﻠﻓ
az: A vitamini
bg: витамин А
ca: vitamina A
cs: vitamín A
cy: fitamin A
de: Vitamin A
dv: ވިޓަމިން އޭ
el: вιταμίνη A
eo: vitamino A
es: vitamina A
et: A-vitamiin
eu: A bitamina
fa: ﻮﯿﺗﺎﻤﯿﻧ ﺁ
fi: A-vitamiini
fo: A vitamin
fr: vitamine A, vitamine Pro-A
gl: vitamina A
he: ויטמין A, רטינול
hi: विटामिन ए
hu: A-vitamin
is: A-vítamín
it: vitamina A
ja: ビタミンA, ビタミンＡ, ビタミン A, ビタミン Ａ, V.A, Ｖ．Ａ, V-A, ＶーＡ
ka: ვიტამინი A
kn: ಎ ಜೀವಸತ್ವ
ko: 비타민 A
lt: vitaminas A
lv: A vitamīns
mk: витамин А
ml: ജീവകം എ
mn: витамин А
mr: अ-जीवनसत्त्व
mt: vitamina A
ne: भिटामिन ए
nl: vitamine A
nn: vitamin A, A-vitamin
oc: vitamina A
or: ଜୀବସାର କ
pa: ਵਿਟਾਮਿਨ ਏ
pl: witamina A
ps: ﻮﻳټﺎﻤﻴﻧ ﺍې
pt: vitamina A
ro: vitamine A, vitamina A
ru: витамин А
rw: vitamini A
si: විටමින් A
sk: vitamín A
sq: vitamina A
sw: vitamini A
ta: உயிர்ச்சத்து ஏ
te: విటమిన్ ఎ
th: วิตามินเอ
tr: A vitamini
tt: А витамины
ug: ۋﻰﺗﺎﻣﻰﻧ A
uk: вітамін A
ur: ﺮﯿﺋٹﻥﻮﻟ
zh: 维生素A

en: retinol
xx: retinol, vitamin A (retinol)
bg: Ретинол
ca: retinol, vitamina A (Retinol)
de: Retinol, Vitamin A (Retinol)
el: ρετινόλη
es: retinol, vitamina A (retinol)
et: retinool
fi: retinoli
fr: rétinol, vitamine A (rétinol)
it: retinolo, vitamina A (retinolo)
lt: retinolis
lv: retinols

en: retinyl acetate, retinol acetate, vitamin A acetate
xx: 3a672a
bg: ретинил ацетат
ca: acetat de retinol
cs: retinyl-acetát
de: Retinylacetat
el: οξική ρετινόλη
es: acetato de retinilo, acetato de vitamina A
et: retinüülatsetaatff
fa: استات رتینیل
fi: retinyyliasetaatti
fr: acétate de rétinol
hu: retinil-acetát
it: acetato di retinile
lt: retinilo acetatas
lv: retinilacetāts
mt: aċetat tar-retinil
nl: retinylacetaat
pl: octan retinylu
pt: acetato de retinilo
ro: acetat de retinil
sh: Retinil acetat
sk: retinylacetát
sl: retinil acetat
sr: Retinil acetat, retinil-acetat
sv: retinylacetat

en: retinyl palmitate, Vitamin A palmitate, palmitate
xx: 3a672b
bg: Ретинил палмитат
cs: retinyl-palmitát
de: Retinylpalmitat
el: παλμιτική ρετινόλη
es: palmitato de retinilo, palmitato
et: retinüülpalmitaat
fa: رتینیل پالمیتات
fi: retinyylipalmitaatti
fr: palmitate de rétinol
hu: retinil-palmitát
it: palmitato di retinile
lt: retinilo palmitatas
lv: retinilpalmitāts
mt: palmitat tar-retinil
nl: retinylpalmitaat
nn: retinylpalmitat
pl: palmitynian retinylu
pt: palmitato de retinilo
ro: palmitat de retinil
sh: Retinil palmitat
sk: retinylpalmitát
sl: retinil palmitat
sr: Retinil palmitat
sv: retinylpalmitat

en: beta-carotene
bg: Бета каротин
ca: beta-carotè, beta-carotens, betacarotè
cs: beta-karoten, β-karoten
da: Betakaroten
de: Beta-Carotin
el: β-καροτένιο
es: beta-caroteno
et: Beetakaroteen
eu: Beta-karoteno
fa: بتاکاروتن
fi: beetakaroteeni, betakaroteeni
fr: bêtacarotène, Bêta-carotène, beta-carotène
gl: Beta-caroteno
he: בטא-קרוטן
hi: बीटा कैरोटीन
hr: beta-karoten
hu: Béta-karotin
id: Beta-karoten
is: Beta-karótín
it: beta-carotene
ja: β-カロテン
ko: 베타카로틴
lt: b-karotenas, Beta karotenas
lv: Beta-karotīns
mk: Бета-каротен
mn: Бета каротин
ms: Beta-Karotena
mt: Beta-karotên, beta-karotina
nl: Beta-caroteen, bèta-caroteen
nn: betakaroten
pl: beta-karoten
pt: Betacaroteno, beta-caroteno
ro: Beta-caroten
ru: бета-каротин, β-каротин
sh: Beta-karoten
sk: Betakarotén, beta-karotén
sl: Beta karoten, beta-karoten
sr: бета-каротен
sv: Betakaroten
ta: பீட்டா கரோட்டீன்
th: บีตา-แคโรทีน
uk: бета-каротин
vi: Beta-Carotene
zh: Β-胡萝卜素

en: provitamin A
ca: provitamina A
de: Provitamin A
es: provitamina A
fi: provitamiini A, A-vitamiinin provitamiini
fr: pro-vitamine A, provitamine A
hr: provitamina A, iz provitamina A
hu: A-provitamin
it: provitamina A
nl: provitamine A

en: beta-carotene dye
ca: colorant de beta-carotè
de: Farbstoff Beta-Carotin
es: colorante de beta-caroteno
fr: colorant bêta-carotène
hu: béta-karotin színezék
it: colorante betacaroteno, colorante beta-carotene
nl: bètacaroteenkleurstof

en: vitamin D, D
xx: vitamin D, D vitamin
af: Vitamien D
ar: فيتامين دي
az: D vitamini
bg: Витамин D
bs: Vitamin D
ca: vitamina D
cs: vitamín D
cy: Fitamin D
da: Vitamin D
de: Vitamin D
dv: ވިޓަމިން ޑީ
el: Βιταμίνη D
eo: Vitamino D
es: vitamina D
et: D-vitamiin
eu: D bitamina
fa: ویتامین د
fi: D-vitamiini
fr: vitamine D
ga: Vitimín D
gl: Vitamina D
he: ויטמין D
hi: विटामिन डी
hr: Vitamin D
hu: D-vitamin
hy: Վիտամին D
id: Vitamin D
is: D-vítamín
it: vitamina D
ja: ビタミンD, ビタミンＤ, ビタミン D, ビタミン Ｄ, V.D, Ｖ．Ｄ, V-D, ＶーＤ
ka: ვიტამინი D
ko: 비타민 D
ky: Кальциферол
lt: Vitaminas D
lv: D vitamīns
ml: ജീവകം ഡി
mn: Д витамин
mr: ड-जीवनसत्त्व
ms: Vitamin D
mt: Vitamina D
nb: vitamin D
ne: भिटामिन डी
nl: vitamine D
nn: vitamin D, D-vitamin
oc: Vitamina D
pa: ਵਿਟਾਮਿਨ ਡੀ
pl: Witamina D
pt: vitamina D, vitaminas D
ro: vitamina D
ru: Витамин D
sh: Vitamin D
si: විටමින් D
sk: Vitamín D
sl: Vitamin D
sq: Vitamina D
sr: витамин Д
su: Vitamin D
sv: vitamin D
ta: உயிர்ச்சத்து டி
te: విటమిన్ డి
tg: Витамини D
th: วิตามินดี
tr: D vitamini
tt: D витамины
ug: ۋىتامىن D
uk: Вітамін D
vi: vitamin D
yi: וויטאמין D
zh: 维生素D

en: Ergocalciferol, Vitamin D2, D2
xx: vitamin D2, vitamin D₂, D₂ vitamin, D2 vitamin
ar: إرغوكالسيفيرول
bg: Ергокалциферол
ca: Ergocalciferol, vitamina D2, D2
cs: ergokalciferol, Vitamín D2
cy: ergocalcifferol
de: Ergocalciferol, Vitamin D2, vitamine D2
el: εργοκαλσιφερόλη
eo: Ergokalciferolo
es: ergocalciferol, vitamina D2, D2
et: ergokaltsiferool
fa: ارگوکالسیفرول
fi: Ergokalsiferoli, D2-vitamiini
fr: ergocalciférol, vitamine D2
hi: एर्गोकैल्सिफेरॉल
hu: D2-vitamin, Ergokalciferol, D2
it: Ergocalciferolo, Vitamina D2
ja: エルゴカルシフェロール, ビタミンD2, ビタミンＤ２, ビタミン D2, ビタミン Ｄ２, V.D2, Ｖ．Ｄ２, V.D₂, V-D2, ＶーＤ２, V-D₂
lt: ergokalciferolis
lv: ergokalciferols
mt: ergokalċiferol
nb: ergokalsiferol, Vitamin D2
nl: Ergocalciferol, vitamine D2
nn: ergokalsiferol, vitamin D2
oc: Ergocalciferol
or: ଏର୍ଗୋକ୍ୟାଲସିଫେରଲ
pl: Ergokalcyferol, Witamina D2
pt: ergocalciferol
ro: Ergocalciferol, Vitamina D2
ru: эргокальциферол, Витамин D2
sh: Ergokalciferol
sk: Ergokalciferol, Vitamín D2
sl: ergokalciferol
sr: ергокалциферол
sv: vitamin D2, D2, ergokalciferol
uk: Ергокальциферол
zh: 麦角钙化醇, 维生素D2

en: Cholecalciferol, vitamin D3, D3
xx: vitamin D3, vitamin D₃, D₃ vitamin, D3 vitamin, 3a671
af: Vitamien D3
ar: كوليكالسيفيرول
az: D3 vitamini
bg: Витамин D3, Холекалциферол
bs: Holekalciferol, Vitamin D3
ca: Colecalciferol, vitamina D3, D3
cs: cholekalciferol, Vitamín D3
cy: colecalcifferol, Fitamin D3
da: vitamin D3, cholecalciferol
de: Cholecalciferol, Vitamin D3
el: χοληκαλσιφερόλη, Βιταμίνη D3
eo: Vitamino D3
es: colecalciferol, vitamina D3, D3
et: kolekaltsiferool
fa: کلکلسیفرول
fi: kolekalsiferoli, D3-vitamiini
fr: cholécalciférol, Vitamine D3
hi: कॉलेकैल्सिफेरॉल
hr: Vitamin D3, kolekalciferol
hu: D3-vitamin, Kolekalciferol, D3
it: Colecalciferolo, Vitamina D3
ja: ビタミンD3, ビタミンＤ３, ビタミン D3, ビタミン Ｄ３, V.D3, Ｖ．Ｄ３, V.D₃, V-D3, ＶーＤ３, V-D₃
ka: ვიტამინი D3
ko: 비타민 D3
lt: Vitaminas D3, cholekalciferolis
lv: D3 vitamīns, holekalciferols
mn: Д3 витамин
ms: Kolekalsiferol, Vitamin D3
mt: kolekalċiferol
nb: vitamin D3, kolekalsiferol
nl: Cholecalciferol, vitamine D3
nn: kolekalciferol, kolekalsiferol, vitamin D3, D3-vitamin
oc: Cholecalciferol, Vitamina D3
or: କୋଲିକ୍ୟାଲସିଫେରଲ
pl: cholekalcyferol, Witamina D3
pt: colecalciferol, Vitamina D3
ro: colecalciferol, Vitamina D3
ru: Холекальциферол, Витамин д3
sh: Holekalciferol
sk: Cholekalciferol
sl: Holekalciferol
sq: Vitamina D3
sr: holekalciferol, Vitamin D3
su: Vitamin D3
sv: vitamin D3, kolekalciferol
tg: Витамини D3
tr: Kolekalsiferol, Vitamin D3
tt: D3 витамины
ug: ۋىتامىن D3
uk: Холекальциферол, Вітамін D3
vi: cholecalciferol, vitamin D3
yi: וויטאמין D3
zh: 胆钙化醇, 维生素D3

en: Vitamin E, tocopherol
xx: vitamin E, E vitamin
af: Vitamien E
ar: فيتامين إي
bg: Токоферол, Витамин Е
ca: Tocoferol, vitamina E
cs: tokoferol, vitamín E
da: Vitamin E
de: Vitamin E
dv: ވިޓަމިން އީ
el: Βιταμίνη E, τοκοφερολεσ
eo: Tokoferolo, vitamino E
es: Vitamina E, tocoferol
et: Tokoferoolid, E-vitamiin, Vitamiin E
eu: E bitamina
fa: ویتامین ای
fi: Tokoferoli, E-vitamiini
fr: tocophérol, vitamine e, vitamines e
gl: Vitamina E
he: E ויטמין
hi: विटामिन ई
hr: vitamin E
hu: E-vitamin, Tokoferol
hy: Վիտամին E
id: Vitamin E
it: Vitamina E
ja: ビタミンE, ビタミンＥ, ビタミン E, ビタミン Ｅ, V.E, Ｖ．Ｅ, V-E, ＶーＥ
jv: Vitamin E
ka: ვიტამინი E
kk: Е дәрумені
ko: 비타민 E
ky: Витамин Е
lt: Tokoferolis, Vitaminas E
lv: E vitamīns
mk: vitamin e
ml: ജീവകം ഇ
mr: इ-जीवनसत्त्व
mt: tokoferol, Vitamina E
nb: vitamin E
ne: भिटामिन ई
nl: Tocoferol, vitamine E
nn: vitamin E, E-vitamin
oc: Vitamina E
pa: ਵਿਟਾਮਿਨ ਈ
pl: Witamina E
pt: Vitamina E
ro: Vitamina E
ru: токоферол, витамин E
sh: Vitamin E
si: විටමින් E
sk: Vitamín E
sl: Tokoferol, vitamin E
sr: vitamin E
sv: Vitamin E
ta: உயிர்ச்சத்து ஈ
te: vitamin e
th: วิตามินอี
tr: Tokoferol, E vitamini
ug: ۋىتامىنE
uk: Вітамін E
vi: Vitamin E
zh: 维生素E

en: D-alpha tocopherol
bg: D-алфа токоферол
cs: D-α-tokoferol
de: D-alpha-Tocopherol
el: D-α-τοκοφερόλη
es: D-alfa tocoferol
et: D-alfa-tokoferool
fi: D-alfa-tokoferoli
fr: D-alpha-tocophérol
hu: D-alfa tokoferol
it: D-alfa-tocoferolo
lt: D-alfa-tokoferolis
lv: D-alfa-tokoferols
mt: D-alfa tokoferol
nl: D-alfa-tocoferol
pl: D-alfa tokoferol
pt: D-alfa-tocoferol
ro: tocoferol D-alfa
sk: D-alfa-tokoferol
sl: D-alfa tokoferol
sv: D-alfa-tokoferol

en: D-alpha tocopheryl acetate, alpha tocopheryl acetate, alpha tocopherol acetate
bg: D-алфатокоферил ацетат
cs: D- α-tokoferyl-acetát
de: D-alpha-Tocopherylacetat
el: οξική D-α-τοκοφερόλη
es: acetato de D-alfa tocoferilo
et: D-alfa-tokoferüülatsetaat
fi: D-alfa-tokoferyyliasetaatti
fr: acétate de D-alpha-tocophérol
hu: D-alfa-tokoferil-acetát
it: acetato di D-alfa-tocoferile
lt: D-alfa-tokoferilacetatas
lv: D-alfa-tokoferilacetāts
mt: Aċetat ta’ D-alfa-tokoferil
nl: D-alfa-tocoferylacetaat
pl: octan D-alfa-tokoferylu
pt: acetato de D-alfa-tocoferilo
ro: acetat de tocoferil D-alfa
sk: D-alfa-tokoferylacetát
sl: D-alfa-tokoferil acetat
sv: D-alfa-tokoferylacetat

en: DL-alpha tocopheryl acetate, dl-alpha tocopherol acetate
xx: 3a700, 3a700i
bg: DL-алфатокоферил ацетат
cs: DL-α-tokoferyl-acetát
de: DL-alpha-Tocopherylacetat
el: οξική DL-α-τοκοφερόλη
es: acetato de DL-alfa tocoferilo, acetato de DL-alfa tocoferol
et: DL-alfa-tokoferüülatsetaat
fi: DL-alfa-tokoferyyliasetaatti
fr: acétate de DL-alpha-tocophérol, acétate de DL-alpha-tocophéryle
hr: DL-alfa-tokoferil acetat, DL-a-tokoferilacetat, DL-alpha-tokoferil acetat, dl-alfa-tokoferil-acetat, DL-a-tokoferil acetat
hu: DL-alfa-tokoferil-acetát
it: acetato di DL-alfa-tocoferile
lt: DL-alfa-tokoferilacetatas
lv: DL-alfa-tokoferilacetāts
mt: Aċetat ta’ DL-alfa-tokoferil
nl: DL-alfa-tocoferylacetaat
nn: dl-α-tokoferylacetat
pl: octan DL-alfa-tokoferylu
pt: acetato de DL-alfa-tocoferilo
ro: acetat de tocoferil DL-alfa
sk: DL-alfa-tokoferylacetát
sl: DL-alfa-tokoferil acetat
sr: DL-a-tokoferil-acetat
sv: DL-alfa-tokoferylacetat

en: D-alpha-tocopheryl acid succinate
bg: D-алфа-токоферил кисел сукцинат
cs: D-α-tokoferyl-sukcinát
de: D-alpha-Tocopherylsäuresuccinat
el: όξινη ηλεκτρική D-α-τοκοφερόλη
es: Succinato ácido de D-alfa tocoferilo
et: D-alfa-tokoferüülhappe suktsinaat
fi: D-alfa-tokoferyylihapon sukkinaatti
fr: succinate acide de D-alpha-tocophérol
hu: D-alfa-tokoferil-szukcinát
it: succinato acido di D-alfa-tocoferile
lt: D-alfa-tokoferilo rūgšties sukcinatas
lv: skābais D-alfa-tokoferilsukcināts
mt: Suċċinat aċidu ta’ D-alfa-tokoferil
nl: D-alfa-tocoferylwaterstof-succinaat
pl: bursztynian D-alfa-tokoferylu
pt: succinato ácido de D-alfa-tocoferilo
ro: succinat acid de tocoferil D-alfa
sk: jantáran kyseliny D-alfa-tokoferolovej
sl: D-alfa-tokoferil kisli sukcinat
sv: D-alfa-tokoferylvätesuccinat

en: D-alpha-tocopheryl polyethylene glycol-1000 succinate, TPGS
bg: D-алфа-токоферил полиетилен гликол-1000 сукцинат, TPGS
cs: polyethylenglykol 1000, ether s -α-tokoferolem, sukcinát, TPGS
de: D-alpha-Tocopheryl-Polyethylenglycol-1000-Succinat, TPGS
el: D-α-τοκοφερυλο-ηλεκτρική πολυαιθυλενο 1000 γλυκόλη, TPGS
es: Succinado de D-alfa-tocoferil polietilenglicol-1000, TPGS
et: D-alfa-tokoferüülpolüeteenglükool-1000-suktsinaat, TPGS
fi: D-alfa-tokoferyylipolyetyleeniglykoli-1000 sukkinaatti
fr: succinate de D-alpha-tocophéryl polyéthylène glycol 1000, TPGS
hu: D-alfa-tokoferil-polietilén-glikol-1000-szukcinát, TPGS
it: succinato D-alfa-tocoferile polietilenglicole 1000, TPGS
lt: D-alfa-tokoferilpolietilenglikol-1000-sukcinatas, TPGS
lv: D-alfa-tokoferilpolietilēnglikola-1000-sukcināts, TPGS
mt: D-alfa-tokoferil polietilene glikol -1000 suċċinat, TPGS
nl: D-alfa-tocoferylpolyethyleenglycolsuccinaat 1000, TPGS
pl: bursztynian D-alfa-tokoferolu polietylen glikolu -1000, TPGS
pt: succinato de D-alfa-tocoferil-polietilenoglicol-1000, TPGS
ro: succinat polietilen glicol 1000 de tocoferil D-alfa, TPGS
sk: D-alfa –tokoferolpolyetylénglykol-1000 sukcinát, TPGS
sl: D-alfa-tokoferil polietilen glikol-1000 sukcinat, TPGS
sv: D-alfa-tokoferyl-polyetylenglykol 1000 succinat, TPGS

en: vitamin K
xx: vitamin K, K vitamin
af: vitamien K
ar: فيتامين ك
az: K vitamini
bg: витамин K
ca: vitamina K
cs: vitamín K
de: Vitamin K
dv: ވިޓަމިން ކޭ
el: βιταμίνη K
es: vitamina K
et: K-vitamiin
eu: K bitamina
fa: ویتامین کا
fi: K-vitamiini, K-vitamiinit
fr: vitamine K
gl: vitamina K
he: ויטמין K
hi: विटामिन के
hu: K-vitamin
hy: Վիտամին K
is: K-vítamín
it: vitamina K
ja: ビタミンK, ビタミンＫ, ビタミン K, ビタミン Ｋ, V.K, Ｖ．Ｋ, V-K, ＶーＫ
ka: ვიტამინი K
ko: 비타민 K
ky: витамин К
lt: vitaminas K
lv: K vitamīns
ml: ജീവകം കെ
mr: के-जीवनसत्त्व
mt: vitamina K
my: ဗီတာမင်ကေ
ne: भिटामिन के
nl: vitamine K, K
oc: vitamina K
pl: witamina K
pt: vitamina K
ro: vitamina K
ru: витамин K
sk: vitamín K
sr: витамин К
sv: K-vitamin
ta: உயிர்ச்சத்து கே
th: วิตามินเค
tr: K vitamini
uk: вітамін K
zh: 维生素K

en: phylloquinone, phytomenadione, Vitamin K1
xx: K1
ar: فايتوميناديون
bg: Филохинон, фитоменадион
ca: filloquinona, Vitamina K1
cs: fyllochinon, fytomenadion, Vitamin K1
da: Fyllokinon
de: Phyllochinon, Phytomenadion, Vitamin K1
el: φυλλοκινόνη, φυτομεναδιόνη
es: filoquinona, fitomenadiona, vitamina K1
et: füllokinoon, fütomenadioon
fa: فیلوکینون
fi: fyllokinoni, fytomenadioni, K1-vitamiini
fr: phylloquinone, phytoménadione, phytonadione, Vitamine K1, K1
hr: vitamin K1
hu: fillokinon, fitomenadion, K1-vitamin
it: fillochinone, fitomenadione, vitamina K1
ja: フィロキノン, ビタミンK1, ビタミンＫ１, ビタミン K1, ビタミン Ｋ１, V.K1, Ｖ．Ｋ１, V.K₁, V-K1, ＶーＫ１, V-K₁
ko: 필로퀴논
ky: Филлохинон
lt: filochinonas, fitomenadionas
lv: filohinons, fitomenadions
mt: fillokinona, fitomenadjona
nl: fyllochinon, fytomenadion, Vitamine K1
or: ଫାଇଟୋମେନାଡିଓନ
pl: filochinon, fitomenadion, witamina K1
pt: filoquinona, fitomenadiona
ro: filochinonă, fitomenadionă
ru: Филлохинон
sh: Filohinon
sk: fylochinón, fytomenadion, Vitamín K1
sl: filokinon, fitomenadion
sr: Filohinon
sv: fyllokinon, fytomenadion
vi: Phytomenadione
zh: 叶绿基甲萘醌

en: menaquinone, vitamin K2
xx: vitamin K2, vitamin K₂, K₂ vitamin, K2 vitamin
bg: менахинон
cs: menachinon
de: Menachinon
el: μενακινόνη
es: menaquinona
et: menakinoon
fi: menakinoni
fr: ménaquinone, vitamine K2
hu: menakinon
it: menachinone
ja: ビタミンK2, ビタミンＫ２, ビタミン K2, ビタミン Ｋ２, V.K2, Ｖ．Ｋ２, V.K₂, V-K2, ＶーＫ２, V-K₂
lt: menachinonas
lv: menahinons
mt: menakinona
nl: menachinon
pl: menachinon
pt: menaquinona
ro: menachinonă
sk: menachinón
sl: menakinon
sv: Menakinon